hr-HR: Materijal kundaka puške: Bakelite; Bukva; Breza; Ugljična vlakna; Stakloplastika; Laminirano drvo; Javor; Metal; Hrast; Ostalo tvrdo drvo; Polimer/sintetika; Orah; Ostalo
th: วัสดุสำหรับพานท้ายปืนไรเฟิล: Bakelite; ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ไม้ลามิเนต; ไม้เมเปิล; โลหะ; ไม้โอ๊ก; ไม้เนื้อแข็งอื่นๆ; โพลีเมอร์/วัสดุสังเคราะห์; ไม้วอลนัท; อื่นๆ
es: Material de la culata del rifle: Bakelite; Haya; Abedul; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidrio; Madera laminada; Arce; Metal; Roble; Otra madera dura; Polímero/sintético; Nogal; Otro
ja: ライフル銃床の素材: Bakelite; ブナ; バーチ; カーボンファイバー; グラスファイバー; 合板; メープル; 金属; オーク; その他の広葉樹; ポリマー / 合成素材; ウォールナット; その他
bg-BG: Материал на приклада на пушката: Bakelite; Бук; Бреза; Въглеродни влакна; Фибростъкло; Ламинирано дърво; Клен; Метал; Дъб; Друга твърда дървесина; Полимер/синтетика; Орех; Други
ro-RO: Material al patului puștii: Bakelite; Fag; Mesteacăn; Fibră de carbon; Fibră de sticlă; Lemn stratificat; Arțar; Metal; Stejar; Alte tipuri de lemn de esență tare; Polimer/Sintetic; Nuc; Altele
fi: Kiväärin tukin materiaali: Bakelite; Pyökki; Koivu; Hiilikuitu; Lasikuitu; Laminoitu puu; Vaahtera; Metalli; Tammi; Muu kovapuu; Polymeeri/synteettinen; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
sk-SK: Materiál pažby pušky: Bakelite; Buk; Breza; Uhlíkové vlákno; Sklolaminát; Laminované drevo; Javor; Kov; Dub; Iné tvrdé drevo; Polymér/syntetika; Orech; Iné
nb: Materiale for geværkolbe: Bakelite; Bøk; Bjørk; Karbonfiber; Glassfiber; Laminert tre; Lønn; Metall; Eik; Annet hardtre; Polymer/syntetisk; Valnøtt; Annet
lt-LT: Šautuvo buožės medžiaga: Bakelite; Buko mediena; Beržo mediena; Anglies pluoštas; Stiklo pluoštas; Laminuota mediena; Klevo mediena; Metalas; Ąžuolo mediena; Kita kietmedžio mediena; Polimeras / sintetika; Riešutmedžio mediena; Kita
pt-BR: Fuzil material da coronha: Bakelite; Faia; Bétula; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Madeira laminada; Bordo; Metal; Carvalho; Outra madeira de lei; Polímero/Sintético; Nogueira; Outro
ko: 소총 개머리판 소재: Bakelite; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 탄소 섬유; 유리 섬유; 집성목; 단풍나무; 금속; 참나무; 기타 활엽수; 폴리머/합성 소재; 호두나무; 기타
vi: Vật liệu làm báng súng trường: Bakelite; Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ bạch dương; Sợi carbon; Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ ép; Gỗ phong; Kim loại; Gỗ sồi; Gỗ cứng khác; Polymer/Tổng hợp; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
en: Rifle stock material: Bakelite; Beech; Birch; Carbon fiber; Fiberglass; Laminated wood; Maple; Metal; Oak; Other hardwood; Polymer/Synthetic; Walnut; Other
de: Material des Gewehrschafts: Bakelite; Buche; Birke; Carbon; Glasfaser; Schichtholz; Ahorn; Metall; Eiche; Sonstiges Hartholz; Polymer/Kunststoff; Walnuss; Sonstige
fr: Matériau de la crosse du fusil: Bakelite; Hêtre; Bouleau; Fibre de carbone; Fibre de verre; Bois lamellé; Érable; Métal; Chêne; Autre bois dur; Polymère/synthétique; Noyer; Autre
zh-CN: 步枪枪托材料: Bakelite; 山毛榉木; 桦木; 碳纤维; 玻璃纤维; 层压木; 枫木; 金属; 橡木; 其他硬木; 聚合物/合成材料; 胡桃木; 其他
it: Materiale per il calcio del fucile: Bachelite; Faggio; Betulla; Fibra di carbonio; Fibra di vetro; Legno laminato; Acero; Metallo; Rovere; Altro legno duro; Polimero/Sintetico; Noce; Altro
sv: Material för gevärsstock: Bakelite; Bok; Björk; Kolfiber; Glasfiber; Laminerat trä; Lönn; Metall; Ek; Annat hårt träslag; Polymer/syntet; Valnöt; Övrigt
pl: Materiał kolby karabinu: Bakelite; Buk; Brzoza; Włókno węglowe; Włókno szklane; Drewno laminowane; Klon; Metal; Dąb; Inne drewno liściaste; Polimer/syntetyk; Orzech; Inne
pt-PT: Material da coronha da espingarda: Bakelite; Faia; Bétula; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Madeira laminada; Bordo; Metal; Carvalho; Outra madeira de lei; Polímero/sintético; Nogueira; Outro
ru: Материал ложи винтовки: Bakelite; Бук; Береза; Углеродное волокно; Стекловолокно; Ламинированная древесина; Клен; Металл; Дуб; Другая твердая древесина; Полимер/синтетика; Орех; Другое
zh-TW: 步槍槍托材質: 電木; 山毛櫸; 樺木; 碳纖維; 玻璃纖維; 層壓木; 楓木; 金屬; 橡木; 其他硬木; 聚合物/合成材料; 胡桃木; 其他
sl-SI: Material kopita puške: Bakelite; Bukev; Breza; Ogljikova vlakna; Steklena vlakna; Laminiran les; Javor; Kovina; Hrast; Drug trdi les; Polimer/Sintetika; Orah; Drugo
cs: Materiál pažby pušky: Bakelite; Buk; Bříza; Uhlíkové vlákno; Sklolaminát; Laminované dřevo; Javor; Kov; Dub; Jiné tvrdé dřevo; Polymer/syntetika; Ořech; Jiné
da: Riffelskæftemateriale: Bakelite; Bøg; Birk; Kulfiber; Glasfiber; Lamineret træ; Ahorn; Metal; Eg; Andet hårdttræ; Polymer/syntetisk; Valnød; Andet
hu: Puskaagy anyaga: Bakelite; Bükk; Nyír; Szénszálas; Üvegszálas; Laminált fa; Juhar; Fém; Tölgy; Egyéb keményfa; Polimer / szintetikus; Dió; Egyéb
tr: Tüfek dipçiği malzemesi: Bakelite; Kayın; Huş; Karbon fiber; Fiberglas; Lamine ahşap; Akçaağaç; Metal; Meşe; Diğer sert ahşap; Polimer/sentetik; Ceviz; Diğer
el: Υλικό κατασκευής της λαβής του τυφεκίου: Bakelite; Οξιά; Σημύδα; Ανθρακονήματα; Fiberglass; Επικολλητή ξυλεία (Laminate); Σφένδαμος; Μέταλλο; Δρυς; Άλλη σκληρή ξυλεία; Πολυμερές/Συνθετικό; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
nl: Geweer kolfmateriaal: Bakelite; Beukenhout; Berkenhout; Koolstofvezel; Glasvezel; Gelamineerd hout; Esdoornhout; Metaal; Eikenhout; Overig hardhout; Polymeer/synthetisch; Walnoothout; Overige